Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-108.01
Observances; not paid holidays.

The observances provided for in sections 84-104.05, 84-104.08, 84-104.09, 84-107, and 84-108 shall not include provisions for such days to be declared paid holidays pursuant to subsection (3) of section 84-1001.

Laws 1991, LB 199, § 2.